Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Form of Acts

6.240.
Date of approval or passage to be stated at end of act.

The date of the approval of an act by the Governor, or the day it passes against his objections, shall be stated at the end of the act.

History.

2420.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Signature of bills, Ky. Const., §§ 56, 88, 89.